California statutes. Education Code
(2) If a school district or charter school is unable to fulfill one or more requirements described in paragraph (1) due to any of the events
 described in subdivision (a) of Section 46392, the school district or charter school shall, at the earliest opportunity after the event no longer exists, fulfill those requirements and shall submit to the county superintendent of schools and the Superintendent the following information:

(A) A description of the emergency event.

(B) The date that the requirements described in paragraph (1) were met.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 8, Sec. 26.   (AB 121)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Financial Reports and Certifications [42130. - 42134.]

42130.

The superintendent of each school district shall, in addition to any other powers and duties granted to or imposed upon him or her, submit two reports to the governing board of the district during each fiscal year. The first report shall cover the financial and budgetary status of the district for the period ending October 31. The second report shall cover the period ending January 31. Both reports shall be approved by the district governing board no later than 45 days after the close of the period being reported. All reports required by this subdivision shall be in a format or on forms prescribed by the Superintendent of Public Instruction, and shall be based on standards and criteria for fiscal stability adopted by the State Board of Education pursuant to Section 33127. The reports, and supporting data, shall be maintained and made available by the school district for public review.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1213, Sec. 23.)
-------------------------------------------

42131.

(a) (1) Pursuant to the reports required by Section 42130, the governing board of each school district shall certify, in writing, within 45 days after the close of the period being reported, whether the school district is able to meet its financial obligations for the remainder of the fiscal year and, based on current forecasts, for the subsequent two fiscal years. These certifications shall be based upon the governing board of the school district’s assessment, on the basis of standards and criteria for fiscal stability adopted by the state board pursuant to Section 33127, of the school district budget, as revised to reflect current information regarding the adopted State Budget, school district property tax revenues pursuant
 to Sections 95 to 100, inclusive, of the Revenue and Taxation Code, and ending balances for the preceding fiscal year as reported pursuant to Section 42100. The certifications shall be classified as positive, qualified, or negative, as prescribed by the Superintendent for purposes of determining subsequent actions by the Superintendent, the Controller, or the county superintendent of schools, pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c). These certifications shall be based upon the financial and budgetary reports required by Section 42130 but may include additional financial information known by the governing board of the school district to exist at the time of each certification. For purposes of this subdivision, a negative certification shall be assigned to any school district that, based upon current projections, will be unable to meet its financial obligations for the remainder of the fiscal year or the
 subsequent fiscal year. A qualified certification shall be assigned to any school district that, based upon current projections, may not meet its financial obligations for the current fiscal year or two subsequent fiscal years. A positive certification shall be assigned to any school district that, based upon current projections, will meet its financial obligations for the current fiscal year and subsequent two fiscal years.

(2) (A) A copy of each certification and a copy of the report submitted to the governing board of the school district pursuant to Section 42130 shall be filed with the county superintendent of schools. If a county office of education receives a positive certification when it determines a negative or qualified certification should have been filed, or receives a qualified certification when it
 determines a negative certification should have been filed, the county superintendent of schools shall change the certification to negative or qualified, as appropriate, and, no later than 75 days after the close of the period being reported, shall provide notice of that action to the governing board of the school district and to the Superintendent. No later than five days after a school district receives notice from the county superintendent of schools of a change in the school district’s certification to negative or qualified, the governing board of the school district may submit an appeal to the Superintendent regarding the validity of that change, in accordance with the criteria applied to those designations pursuant to this subdivision. No later than 10 days after receiving that appeal, the Superintendent shall determine the certification to be assigned to the school district and shall notify the
 governing board of the school district and the county superintendent of schools of that determination.

(B) Copies of any certification in which the governing board of the school district is unable to certify unqualifiedly that these financial obligations will be met and a copy of the report submitted to the governing board of the school district pursuant to Section 42130 shall be sent by the county office of education to the Controller and the Superintendent at the time of the certification, together with a completed transmittal form provided by the Superintendent. Within 75 days after the close of the reporting period on all school district certifications that are classified as qualified or negative pursuant to this section, the appropriate county superintendent of schools shall submit to the Superintendent and the Controller the
 county superintendent of schools’ comments on those certifications and report any action proposed or taken pursuant to subdivision (b).

(3) All reports and certifications required under this subdivision shall be in a format or on forms prescribed by the Superintendent and shall be based on standards and criteria for fiscal stability adopted by the state board pursuant to Section 33127.

(4) This subdivision does not preclude the submission of additional budgetary or financial reports by the county superintendent of schools to the governing board of the school district, or to the Superintendent.

(b) As to any school district having a negative or qualified certification, the county superintendent of schools shall exercise
 the county superintendent of schools’ authority, as necessary, pursuant to Section 42127.6.

(c) Within 75 days after the close of each reporting period, each county superintendent of schools shall report to the Controller and the Superintendent as to whether the governing board of each of the school districts under the county superintendent of schools’ jurisdiction has submitted the certification required by subdivision (a). That report shall account for all school districts under the jurisdiction of the county office of education and indicate the type of certification filed by each school district.

(d) The Controller’s office may conduct an audit or review of the fiscal condition of any school district having a negative or qualified certification.

(e) Any school district having a negative or qualified certification, or classified as qualified or negative by the county superintendent of schools, shall continue to be classified as qualified or negative until the next report required under Section 42130 is filed.

(f) The governing board of each school district filing a qualified or negative certification for the second report required under Section 42130, or classified as qualified or negative by the county superintendent of schools, shall provide to the county superintendent of schools, the Controller, and the Superintendent no later than June 1, financial statement projections of the school district’s fund and cash balances through June 30 for the period ending April 30. The governing boards of all other school districts are
 encouraged to develop a similar financial statement for use in developing the beginning fund balances of the school district for the ensuing fiscal year.

(g) A school district for which the county board of education serves as the governing board of the school district is not subject to subdivisions (a) to (f), inclusive, but is governed instead by the interim report, monitoring, and review procedures set forth in subdivision (l) of Section 1240 and in Article 2 (commencing with Section 1620) of Chapter 5 of Part 2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 24, Sec. 27.   (SB 98)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

42132.

On or before September 15 of each year, the governing board of each school district shall adopt a resolution to identify, pursuant to Division 9 (commencing with Section 7900) of Title 1 of the Government Code, the estimated appropriations limit for the district for the current fiscal year and the actual appropriations limit for the district for the preceding fiscal year. That resolution shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of the governing board. Notwithstanding Section 7910 of the Government Code, documentation used in the identification of the appropriations limits shall be made available to the public on the date of the meeting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 677, Sec. 20.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

42133.

(a) A school district that has a qualified or negative certification in any fiscal year may not issue, in that fiscal year or in the next succeeding fiscal year, certificates of participation, tax anticipation notes, revenue bonds, or any other debt instruments that do not require the approval of the voters of the district, nor may the district cause an information report regarding the debt instrument to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 149 of Title 26 of the United States Code, unless the county superintendent of schools determines, pursuant to criteria established by the Superintendent of Public Instruction, that the district’s repayment of that indebtedness is probable. A school district is deemed to have a qualified or negative certification for purposes of this subdivision if, pursuant to this article, it files that certification or the county superintendent of schools classifies the certification for that fiscal year to be qualified or negative. 

(b) A county office of education that has a qualified or negative certification in any fiscal year may not issue, in that fiscal year or in the next succeeding fiscal year, certificates of participation, tax anticipation notes, revenue bonds, or any other debt instruments not requiring the approval of the voters of the district, nor may the county office of education cause an information report regarding the debt instrument to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 149 of Title 26 of the United States Code, unless the Superintendent of Public Instruction determines that the repayment of that indebtedness by the county office of education is probable. A county office of education is deemed to have a qualified or negative certification for purposes of this subdivision if, pursuant to this article, it files that certification or the Superintendent of Public Instruction classifies the certification for that fiscal year to be qualified or negative. For purposes of this subdivision, “county office of education” includes a school district that is governed by a county board of education. 

(c) No later than March 31, 1992, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall develop and adopt criteria and standards to govern the determination to be made under subdivisions (a) and (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1213, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

42133.5.

Regardless of the certification of the budgetary status of a school district or county office of education under subdivision (l) of Section 1240 or Section 42131, the proceeds obtained by a school district from the sources listed in subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, shall not be used for general operating purposes of the school district.

(a) The sale of a saleback or leaseback agreement, or interests in the agreement.

(b) A debt instrument payable from payments under a saleback or leaseback agreement.

(c) Certificates of participation.

(d) Other
 debt instruments that meet both of the following criteria:

(A) They are secured by real property.

(B) They do not require the approval of the voters of the school district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 140, Sec. 52.   (AB 1164)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

42134.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall publish annually a multiyear projection of the revenues that will be available to school districts and county offices of education from state and local sources, for use by school districts and county offices of education in determining the multiyear financial condition of those entities for the purposes of this article and Article 2. That projection shall be based on revenue forecasts issued by the Department of Finance, the Legislative Analyst, or the Commission on State Finance, shall be published in a form that may easily be used by school districts and county offices of education, and shall be made available to those entities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1213, Sec. 26.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Public Disclosure of Fiscal Obligations [42140. - 42142.]

42140.

(a) If a school district or county office of education, either individually or as a member of a joint powers agency, provides health and welfare benefits for employees upon their retirement, and those benefits will continue after the employees reach 65 years of age, the superintendent of the school district or county superintendent of schools, as appropriate, annually shall provide information to the governing board of the school district or the county board of education, as appropriate, regarding the estimated accrued but unfunded cost of those benefits. The estimate of cost shall be based upon an actuarial report that incorporates annual fiscal information and is obtained by the superintendent at least every three years. The actuarial report shall be performed by an actuary who is a member of the American Academy of Actuaries. If the school district or county office of education regularly contracts for an actuarial report for other fiscal matters, a separate actuarial report is not required, if the estimate of costs required by this subdivision is separately and clearly set forth in that report.

(b) The cost information required by subdivision (a) and a copy of the actuarial report on which the estimated costs are based shall be presented by the superintendent at a public meeting of the governing board. At that meeting, the governing board shall disclose, as a separate agenda item, whether or not it will reserve a sufficient amount of money in its budget to fund the present value of the health and welfare benefits of existing retirees or the future cost of employees who are eligible for benefits in the current fiscal year, or both.

(c) The governing board annually shall certify to the county superintendent of schools the amount of money, if any, that it has decided to reserve in its budget for the cost of those benefits, and shall submit to the county superintendent of schools any budget revisions that may be necessary to account for that budget reserve.

(d) The county board of education annually shall certify to the Superintendent of Public Instruction the amount of money, if any, that has been reserved in the budget of the county office of education for the cost of those benefits.

(e) This section is inoperative on January 1, 2005.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 895, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

42141.

(a) If a school district or county office of education, either individually or as a member of a joint powers agency, is self-insured for workers’ compensation claims, the superintendent of the school district or county superintendent of schools, as appropriate, annually shall provide information to the governing board of the school district or the county board of education, as appropriate, regarding the estimated accrued but unfunded cost of those claims. The estimate of costs shall be based on an actuarial report that incorporates annual fiscal information and is obtained by the superintendent at least every three years. The actuarial report shall be performed by an actuary who is a member of the American Academy of Actuaries. If the school district or county office of education regularly contracts for an actuarial report for other fiscal matters, a separate actuarial report is not required, if the estimate of costs required by this subdivision is separately and clearly set forth in that report.

(b) The cost information required by subdivision (a) and a copy of the actuarial report on which the estimated costs are based shall be presented by the superintendent at a public meeting of the governing board. At that meeting, the governing board shall disclose, as a separate agenda item, whether or not it will reserve a sufficient amount of money in its budget to fund the present value of the accrued but unpaid workers’ compensation claims or if it is otherwise decreasing the amount in its workers’ compensation reserve fund.

(c) The governing board annually shall certify to the county superintendent of schools the amount of money, if any, that it has decided to reserve in its budget for the cost of those claims, and shall submit to the county superintendent of schools any budget revisions that may be necessary to account for that budget reserve.

(d) The county board of education annually shall certify to the Superintendent of Public Instruction the amount of money, if any, that has been reserved in the budget of the county office of education for the cost of those claims.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1158, Sec. 10.   Effective September 30, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

42142.

Within 45 days of adopting a collective bargaining agreement, the superintendent of the school district shall forward to the county superintendent of schools any revisions to the school district’s current year budget that are necessary to fulfill the terms of that agreement. Any additional costs to the school district that may result from the terms of the collective bargaining agreement also shall be reflected in any interim fiscal reports or multiyear fiscal projections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 650, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6.5. School Districts in Financial Distress [42160. - 42163.]

42160.

(a) For the 2018–19 fiscal year, by March 1, 2019, the Oakland Unified School District, in collaboration with and with the concurrence of the Alameda County Superintendent of Schools and the County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team, shall do both of the following:

(1) Update or develop short- and long-term financial plans based on reasonable and accurate assumptions and current and past year expenditure data.

(2) Review and update school district facilities construction plans to ensure that costs are reasonable, accurate, and align with long-term financial plans for fiscal solvency.

(b) Beginning
 with the 2019–20 fiscal year, the Budget Act shall include an appropriation for the Oakland Unified School District, if the school district complies with the terms specified in subdivisions (a) and (c), in the following amounts:

(1) For the 2019–20 fiscal year, up to 75 percent of the school district’s projected operating deficit, as determined by the County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team, with concurrence with the Department of Finance.

(2) For the 2020–21 fiscal year, up to 50 percent of the school district’s projected operating deficit, as determined by the County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team, with concurrence with the Department of Finance.

(3) For the 2021–22 fiscal year, up to 25 percent of the school district’s projected operating deficit, as determined by the County
 Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team, with concurrence with the Department of Finance.

(c) Disbursement of funds specified in subdivision (b) shall be contingent on the Oakland Unified School District’s completion of activities specified in the prior year Budget Act to improve the school district’s fiscal solvency. These activities may include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Completion of comprehensive operational reviews that compare the needs of the school district with similar school districts and provide data and recommendations regarding changes the school district can make to achieve fiscal sustainability.

(2) Adoption and implementation of necessary budgetary solutions, including the consolidation of school sites.

(3) Completion and implementation of multiyear, fiscally solvent budgets and budget plans.

(4) Qualification for positive certification pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 42130) of Chapter 6.

(5) Sale or lease of surplus property.

(6) Growth and maintenance of budgetary reserves.

(7) Approval of school district budgets by the Alameda County Superintendent of Schools.

(d) Funds described in subdivision (b) shall be allocated to Oakland Unified School District upon the certification of the County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team, with concurrence from the Alameda County Superintendent of Schools, to the Assembly Committee on Budget, Senate
 Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review, and the Department of Finance that the activities described in subdivision (c), as specified in the prior year Budget Act, have been completed. Additionally, by March 1 of each year, through March 1, 2021, the County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team, with concurrence from the Alameda County Superintendent of Schools, shall report to the Assembly Committee on Budget, Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review, and the Department of Finance the progress that Oakland Unified School District has made to complete the activities described in subdivision (c), as specified in the prior year Budget Act.

(e) The activities described in subdivision (c) shall be determined in the annual Budget Act based on joint recommendations from the County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team and the Alameda County Superintendent of Schools. These recommendations shall be submitted to the
 Assembly Committee on Budget, Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review, and the Department of Finance by March 1 of each fiscal year, through March 1, 2021, in conjunction with the certification described in subdivision (d).

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 426, Sec. 16.   (AB 1840)   Effective September 17, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

42161.

(a) For the 2018–19 fiscal year, the Inglewood Unified School District shall do both of the following:

(1) Meet the requirements for qualified or positive certification for the school district’s second interim report pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 42130) of Chapter 6.

(2) Complete comprehensive operational reviews that compare the needs of the school district with similar school districts and provide data and recommendations regarding changes the school district can make to achieve fiscal sustainability.

(b) Beginning with the 2019–20 fiscal year, the Budget Act shall include an appropriation for the
 Inglewood Unified School District, if the school district complies with the terms specified in subdivisions (a) and (c), in the following amounts:

(1) For the 2019–20 fiscal year, up to 75 percent of the school district’s projected operating deficit, as determined by the County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team, with concurrence with the Department of Finance.

(2) For the 2020–21 fiscal year, up to 50 percent of the school district’s projected operating deficit, as determined by the County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team, with concurrence with the Department of Finance.

(3) For the 2021–22 fiscal year, up to 25 percent of the school district’s projected operating deficit, as determined by the County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team, with concurrence with the
 Department of Finance.

(c) Disbursement of funds specified in subdivision (b) shall be contingent on the Inglewood Unified School District’s completion of activities specified in the prior year Budget Act to improve the school district’s fiscal solvency. These activities may include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Completion of comprehensive operational reviews that compare the needs of the school district with similar school districts and provide data and recommendations regarding changes the school district can make to achieve fiscal sustainability.

(2) Adoption and implementation of necessary budgetary solutions, including the consolidation of school sites.

(3) Completion and implementation of multiyear, fiscally solvent budgets
 and budget plans.

(4) Qualification for positive certification pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 42130) of Chapter 6.

(5) Sale or lease of surplus property.

(6) Growth and maintenance of budgetary reserves.

(7) Approval of school district budgets by the Los Angeles County Superintendent of Schools.

(d) Funds described in subdivision (b) shall be allocated to Inglewood Unified School District upon the certification of the County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team, with concurrence from the Los Angeles County Superintendent of Schools, to the Assembly Committee on Budget, Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review, and the Department of Finance that the
 activities described in subdivision (c), as specified in the prior year Budget Act, have been completed. Additionally, by March 1 of each year, through March 1, 2021, the County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team, with concurrence from the Los Angeles County Superintendent of Schools, shall report to the Assembly Committee on Budget, Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review, and the Department of Finance the progress that Inglewood Unified School District has made to complete the activities described in subdivision (c), as specified in the prior year Budget Act.

(e) The activities described in subdivision (c) shall be determined in the annual Budget Act based on joint recommendations from the County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team and the Los Angeles County Superintendent of Schools. These recommendations shall be submitted to the Assembly Committee on Budget, Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal
 Review, and the Department of Finance by March 1 of each fiscal year, through March 1, 2021, in conjunction with the certification described in subdivision (d).

(f) Until June 30, 2019, the Superintendent may waive the reimbursement determination specified in Section 18054 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations for Inglewood Unified School District’s 2016–17 fiscal year California state preschool program contract in order to resolve the school district’s outstanding child development reimbursement liability to the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 426, Sec. 16.   (AB 1840)   Effective September 17, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

42162.

(a) By April 1, 2023, the Oakland Unified School District, in collaboration with and with the concurrence of the Alameda County Superintendent of Schools and the County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team, shall do all of the following:

(1) Update or develop short- and long-term financial plans based on reasonable and accurate assumptions and current and past year expenditure data.

(2) Review and update school district facilities construction plans to ensure that costs are reasonable, accurate, and align with long-term financial plans for fiscal solvency.

(3) Undergo an on-time annual independent
 audit pursuant to Section 41020 that is free of material weaknesses and that includes an unqualified opinion. Furthermore, the audit shall be free from any material internal control findings.

(b) In the 2023–24 fiscal year, the annual Budget Act shall include an appropriation for the Oakland Unified School District, if the school district complies with the terms specified in subdivisions (a) and (c), of up to 25 percent of the school district’s projected operating deficit, as determined by the County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team, with concurrence of the Department of Finance.

(c) Disbursement of funds specified in subdivision (b) shall be contingent on the Oakland Unified School District’s completion of activities specified in the prior year Budget Act to improve the school district’s fiscal solvency. These activities may include, but are not limited to, all
 of the following:

(1) Updated comprehensive operational reviews that compare the needs of the school district with similar school districts and provide data and recommendations regarding changes the school district can make to achieve fiscal sustainability, with progress updates on each of the recommendations.

(2) Adoption and implementation of necessary budgetary solutions.

(3) Completion and implementation of multiyear, fiscally solvent budgets and budget plans.

(4) Qualification for positive certification pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 42130) of Chapter 6.

(5) Sale or lease of surplus property.

(6) Growth
 and maintenance of budgetary reserves.

(7) Approval of school district budgets by the Alameda County Superintendent of Schools.

(8) Prompt appointment following a competitive process of a permanent, experienced, and highly qualified chief business official for any vacancy of chief business official.

(d) Funds described in subdivision (b) shall be allocated to Oakland Unified School District upon the certification of the County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team, with concurrence from the Alameda County Superintendent of Schools, to the Assembly Committee on Budget, Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review, and the Department of Finance that the activities described in subdivision (c) have been completed. Additionally, by October 1, 2023, the County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance
 Team, with concurrence from the Alameda County Superintendent of Schools, shall report to the Assembly Committee on Budget, Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review, and the Department of Finance the progress that Oakland Unified School District has made to complete the activities described in subdivision (c).

(e) The activities described in subdivision (c) shall be determined in the annual Budget Act based on joint recommendations from the County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team and the Alameda County Superintendent of Schools. These recommendations shall be submitted to the Assembly Committee on Budget, Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review, and the Department of Finance biannually by April 1 and by November 1 of the 2023–24 and 2024–25 fiscal years, in conjunction with the certification described in subdivision (d).

(f) Of the moneys apportioned to
 Oakland Unified School District pursuant to this section from an appropriation made for purposes of this section, the school district shall return to the state such moneys if subsequent to the annual apportionment it is determined that the school district did not meet the conditions established herein. The Director of the Department of Finance may initiate such return of prior apportionments if the conditions were not subsequently met and may rely on recommendations from the County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team and the Alameda County Superintendent of Schools in making such determination.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 52, Sec. 36.   (AB 181)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

42163.

(a) By April 1, 2023, the Inglewood Unified School District shall do all of the following:

(1) Meet the requirements for qualified or positive certification for the school district’s second interim report pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 42130) of Chapter 6.

(2) Complete comprehensive operational reviews that compare the needs of the school district with similar school districts and provide data and recommendations regarding changes the school district can make to achieve fiscal sustainability.

(3) Undergo an on-time annual independent audit pursuant to Section 41020 that is free of material
 weaknesses and that includes an unqualified opinion. Furthermore, the audit shall be free from any material internal control findings.

(b) Beginning with the 2022–23 fiscal year, the annual Budget Act shall include an appropriation for the Inglewood Unified School District, if the school district complies with the terms specified in subdivisions (a) and (c), of up to 25 percent of the school district’s projected operating deficit, as determined by the County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team, with concurrence with the Department of Finance.

(c) Disbursement of funds specified in subdivision (b) shall be contingent on the Inglewood Unified School District’s completion of activities specified in the prior year Budget Act to improve the school district’s fiscal solvency. These activities may include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Updated comprehensive operational reviews that compare the needs of the school district with similar school districts and provide data and recommendations regarding changes the school district can make to achieve fiscal sustainability, with a progress update on each of the recommendations.

(2) Adoption and implementation of necessary budgetary solutions.

(3) Completion and implementation of multiyear, fiscally solvent budgets and budget plans.

(4) Qualification for positive certification pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 42130) of Chapter 6.

(5) Sale or lease of surplus property.

(6) Growth and maintenance of
 budgetary reserves.

(7) Approval of school district budgets by the Los Angeles County Superintendent of Schools.

(8) Prompt appointment following a competitive process of a permanent, experienced, and highly qualified chief business official for any vacancy of chief business official.

(d) Funds described in subdivision (b) shall be allocated to Inglewood Unified School District upon the certification of the County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team, with concurrence from the Los Angeles County Superintendent of Schools, to the Assembly Committee on Budget, Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review, and the Department of Finance that the activities described in subdivision (c) have been completed. Additionally, by October 1, 2023, the County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team, with
 concurrence from the Los Angeles County Superintendent of Schools, shall report to the Assembly Committee on Budget, Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review, and the Department of Finance the progress that Inglewood Unified School District has made to complete the activities described in subdivision (c).

(e) The activities described in subdivision (c) shall be determined in the annual Budget Act based on joint recommendations from the County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team and the Los Angeles County Superintendent of Schools. These recommendations shall be submitted to the Assembly Committee on Budget, Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review, and the Department of Finance by April 1, 2023, and November 1, 2023, in conjunction with the certification described in subdivision (d).

(f) Of the moneys apportioned to the Inglewood Unified School District
 pursuant to this section from an appropriation made for purposes of this section, the school district shall return to the state such moneys if subsequent to the annual apportionment it is determined that the school district did not meet the conditions established herein. The Director of the Department of Finance may initiate such return of prior apportionments if the conditions were not subsequently met and may rely on recommendations from the County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team and the Los Angeles County Superintendent of Schools in making such determination.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 52, Sec. 37.   (AB 181)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Local Taxation by School Districts [42238. - 42289.6.]



  ARTICLE 2. Apportionments and Revenue Control [42238. - 42252.]

42238.

(a) For the 1984–85 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the county superintendent of schools shall determine a revenue limit for each school district in the county pursuant to this section.

(b) The base revenue limit for a fiscal year shall be determined by adding to the base revenue limit for the prior fiscal year the following amounts:

(1) The inflation adjustment specified in Section 42238.1.

(2) For the 1995–96 fiscal year, the equalization adjustment specified in Section 42238.4.

(3) For the 1996–97 fiscal year, the equalization adjustments specified in
 Sections 42238.41, 42238.42, and 42238.43.

(4) For the 1985–86 fiscal year, the amount per unit of average daily attendance received in the 1984–85 fiscal year pursuant to Section 42238.7.

(5) For the 1985–86, 1986–87, and 1987–88 fiscal years, the amount per unit of average daily attendance received in the prior fiscal year pursuant to Section 42238.8.

(6) For the 2004–05 fiscal year, the equalization adjustment specified in Section 42238.44.

(7) For the 2006–07 fiscal year, the equalization adjustment specified in Section 42238.48.

(8) For the 2011–12 fiscal year, the equalization adjustment specified in Section 42238.49.

(c) (1) (A) For the 2010–11 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall compute an add-on for each school district by adding the inflation adjustment specified in Section 42238.1 to the adjustment specified in Section 42238.485.

(B) For the 2011–12 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the Superintendent shall compute an add-on for each school district by adding the inflation adjustment specified in Section 42238.1 to the amount computed pursuant to this paragraph for the prior fiscal year.

(2) Commencing with the 2010–11 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall compute an add-on for each school district by dividing each school district’s fiscal year average daily attendance computed pursuant to Section 42238.5 by the total adjustments in funding for each
 school district made for the 2007–08 fiscal year pursuant to Section 42238.22 as it read on January 1, 2009.

(d) The sum of the base revenue limit computed pursuant to subdivision (b) and the add-on computed pursuant to subdivision (c) shall be multiplied by the school district average daily attendance computed pursuant to Section 42238.5.
